Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1345
Unlawful acts; harming or disrupting operations; penalties.

(1) Any person who accesses or causes to be accessed any computer, computer system, computer software, or computer network without authorization or who, having accessed any computer, computer system, computer software, or computer network with authorization, knowingly and intentionally exceeds the limits of such authorization shall be guilty of an offense if he or she intentionally: (a) Alters, damages, deletes, or destroys any computer, computer system, computer software, computer network, computer program, data, or other property; (b) disrupts the operation of any computer, computer system, computer software, or computer network; or (c) distributes a destructive computer program with intent to damage or destroy any computer, computer system, computer network, or computer software.

(2) The offense constitutes a Class III felony when the value of the loss caused is five thousand dollars or more.

(3) The offense constitutes a Class IV felony when the value of the loss caused is one thousand five hundred dollars or more, but less than five thousand dollars.

(4) The offense constitutes a Class I misdemeanor when the value of the loss caused is five hundred dollars or more, but less than one thousand five hundred dollars.

(5) The offense constitutes a Class II misdemeanor when the value of the loss caused is less than five hundred dollars.

Laws 1985, LB 371, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 57.